dev/adverb/adverb.ne.dix
  <!-- गालानिर; गालानिर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गालानिर__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दिनदिनै; दिनदिनै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दिनदिनै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ठयाक्कै; ठयाक्कै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ठयाक्कै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बेसरी; बेसरी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बेसरी__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सट्टासट; सट्टासट; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सट्टासट__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- एकरति; एकरति; 1 -->
    <pardef n="एकरति__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बराबरी; बराबरी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बराबरी__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- याहीं; याहीं; 1 -->
    <pardef n="याहीं__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- आफन्तहरूकहाँभन्दा; आफन्तहरूकहाँभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="आफन्तहरूकहाँभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सकभर; सकभर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सकभर__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- स्वत; स्वत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="स्वत__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पार्नेबित्तिकै; पार्नेबित्तिकै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पार्नेबित्तिकै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ढल्पल-ढल्पल; ढल्पल-ढल्पल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ढल्पल-ढल्पल__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यही; यही; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यही__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रतिदिन; प्रतिदिन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रतिदिन__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सितिमिति; सितिमिति; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सितिमिति__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- औंधि; औंधि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="औंधि__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वर्षेनी; वर्षेनी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वर्षेनी__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अगाडी; अगाडी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अगाडी__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- आदि; आदि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="आदि__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चारैतिर; चारैतिर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="चारैतिर__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तब्; तब्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तब्__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ओइलाउनुभन्दा; ओइलाउनुभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ओइलाउनुभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अत्यन्त; अत्यन्त; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अत्यन्त__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फतक्कै; फतक्कै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="फतक्कै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- त्याहाँ; त्याहाँ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="त्याहाँ__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ध्यानपूर्वक; ध्यानपूर्वक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ध्यानपूर्वक__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वर; वर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वर__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ख्वार्र; ख्वार्र; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ख्वार्र__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- संभवतः; संभवतः; 1 -->
    <pardef n="संभवतः__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पहुँचभन्दा; पहुँचभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पहुँचभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चिम्म; चिम्म; 1 -->
    <pardef n="चिम्म__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- त्यतै; त्यतै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="त्यतै__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- स्वरूपअनुसार; स्वरूपअनुसार; 1 -->
    <pardef n="स्वरूपअनुसार__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चुप्प; चुप्प; 1 -->
    <pardef n="चुप्प__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गम्भीरताभन्दा; गम्भीरताभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गम्भीरताभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विवाहभन्दा; विवाहभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विवाहभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- साथसाथै; साथसाथै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="साथसाथै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हठात; हठात; 1 -->
    <pardef n="हठात__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- थपक्क; थपक्क; 1 -->
    <pardef n="थपक्क__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- आफ्नै; आफ्नै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="आफ्नै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फस्लाङ; फस्लाङ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="फस्लाङ__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तल्लो; तल्लो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तल्लो__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- शायद्; शायद्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="शायद्__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="गालानिर"><i>गालानिर</i><par n="गालानिर__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="दिनदिनै"><i>दिनदिनै</i><par n="दिनदिनै__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ठयाक्कै"><i>ठयाक्कै</i><par n="ठयाक्कै__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="बेसरी"><i>बेसरी</i><par n="बेसरी__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सट्टासट"><i>सट्टासट</i><par n="सट्टासट__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="एकरति"><i>एकरति</i><par n="एकरति__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="बराबरी"><i>बराबरी</i><par n="बराबरी__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="याहीं"><i>याहीं</i><par n="याहीं__"/></e>
    <e lm="आफन्तहरूकहाँभन्दा"><i>आफन्तहरूकहाँभन्दा</i><par n="आफन्तहरूकहाँभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सकभर"><i>सकभर</i><par n="सकभर__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="स्वत"><i>स्वत</i><par n="स्वत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="पार्नेबित्तिकै"><i>पार्नेबित्तिकै</i><par n="पार्नेबित्तिकै__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ढल्पल-ढल्पल"><i>ढल्पल-ढल्पल</i><par n="ढल्पल-ढल्पल__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="यही"><i>यही</i><par n="यही__"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रतिदिन"><i>प्रतिदिन</i><par n="प्रतिदिन__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सितिमिति"><i>सितिमिति</i><par n="सितिमिति__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="औंधि"><i>औंधि</i><par n="औंधि__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="वर्षेनी"><i>वर्षेनी</i><par n="वर्षेनी__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अगाडी"><i>अगाडी</i><par n="अगाडी__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="आदि"><i>आदि</i><par n="आदि__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="चारैतिर"><i>चारैतिर</i><par n="चारैतिर__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="तब्"><i>तब्</i><par n="तब्__"/></e>
    <e lm="ओइलाउनुभन्दा"><i>ओइलाउनुभन्दा</i><par n="ओइलाउनुभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अत्यन्त"><i>अत्यन्त</i><par n="अत्यन्त__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="फतक्कै"><i>फतक्कै</i><par n="फतक्कै__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="त्याहाँ"><i>त्याहाँ</i><par n="त्याहाँ__"/></e>
    <e lm="ध्यानपूर्वक"><i>ध्यानपूर्वक</i><par n="ध्यानपूर्वक__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="वर"><i>वर</i><par n="वर__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ख्वार्र"><i>ख्वार्र</i><par n="ख्वार्र__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="संभवतः"><i>संभवतः</i><par n="संभवतः__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="पहुँचभन्दा"><i>पहुँचभन्दा</i><par n="पहुँचभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="चिम्म"><i>चिम्म</i><par n="चिम्म__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यतै"><i>त्यतै</i><par n="त्यतै__"/></e>
    <e lm="स्वरूपअनुसार"><i>स्वरूपअनुसार</i><par n="स्वरूपअनुसार__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="चुप्प"><i>चुप्प</i><par n="चुप्प__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="गम्भीरताभन्दा"><i>गम्भीरताभन्दा</i><par n="गम्भीरताभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="विवाहभन्दा"><i>विवाहभन्दा</i><par n="विवाहभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="साथसाथै"><i>साथसाथै</i><par n="साथसाथै__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="हठात"><i>हठात</i><par n="हठात__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="थपक्क"><i>थपक्क</i><par n="थपक्क__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="आफ्नै"><i>आफ्नै</i><par n="आफ्नै__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="फस्लाङ"><i>फस्लाङ</i><par n="फस्लाङ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="तल्लो"><i>तल्लो</i><par n="तल्लो__"/></e>
    <e lm="शायद्"><i>शायद्</i><par n="शायद्__adv"/></e>
